District of Columbia statutes.
15-524

Replevin against officer.

This subchapter does not prevent a claimant other than the defendant from bringing an action of replevin against the officer levying upon the property claimed as described in this subchapter.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 531, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 15-524.
1973 Ed., § 15-524.

Prior Codifications